Washington statutes.
RCW 46.04.1261

Collector vehicle license plate.

"Collector vehicle license plate" means a special license plate that may be assigned to a vehicle that is more than thirty years old.

[ 2010 c 161 s 109.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.